Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.171

Applications—Conditions—Fees.

(1) A person desiring a license as a real estate firm shall apply on a form prescribed by the director. A person desiring a license as a real estate broker or managing broker must pay an examination fee and pass an examination. The person shall apply for an examination and for a license on a form prescribed by the director. Concurrently, the applicant shall meet the following requirements:

(a) Furnish other proof as the director may require concerning the honesty, truthfulness, and good reputation, as well as the identity, which may include fingerprints and criminal background checks, of any applicants for a license, or of the officers of a corporation, limited liability company, other legally recognized business entity, or the partners of a limited liability partnership or partnership, making the application;

(b) If the applicant is a legally recognized business entity, except a general partnership, it must be registered with the secretary of state and must furnish a list of governors that includes:

(i) For corporations, a list of officers and directors and their addresses;

(ii) For limited liability companies, a list of members and managers and their addresses;

(iii) For limited liability partnerships, a list of the partners and their addresses; or

(iv) For other legal business entities, a list of the governors and their addresses;

(c) If the applicant is a general partnership, the applicant shall furnish a copy of the signed partnership agreement and a list of the partners thereof and their addresses;

(d) Unless the applicant is a corporation or limited liability company, complete a fingerprint-based background check through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through the federal bureau of investigation. The applicant must submit the fingerprints and required fee for the background check to the director for submission to the Washington state patrol. The director may consider the recent issuance of a license that required a fingerprint-based national criminal information background check, or recent employment in a position that required a fingerprint-based national criminal information background check, in addition to fingerprints to accelerate the licensing and endorsement process. The director may adopt rules to establish a procedure to allow a person covered by this section to have the person's background rechecked under this subsection upon application for a renewal license.

(2) The director must develop by rule a procedure and schedule to ensure all applicants for licensure have a fingerprint and background check done on a regular basis.

[ 2019 c 442 s 4; 2008 c 23 s 17; 1997 c 322 s 8; 1987 c 332 s 4; 1980 c 72 s 1; 1979 c 25 s 1. Prior: 1977 ex.s. c 370 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 24 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 42 s 1; 1953 c 235 s 6; 1951 c 222 s 10. Formerly: (i) 1947 c 203 s 1, part; 1945 c 111 s 3, part; 1943 c 118 s 2, part; 1941 c 252 s 11, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8340-34, part; prior: 1925 ex.s. c 129 ss 10, 11. (ii) 1947 c 203 s 3; 1945 c 111 s 6; 1941 c 252 s 16; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8340-39. Formerly RCW 18.85.120.]